Washington statutes.
RCW 1.04.021

Rule of construction—Prima facie law.

The contents of said code shall establish prima facie the laws of this state of a general and permanent nature in effect on January 1, 1949, but nothing herein shall be construed as changing the meaning of any such laws. In case of any omissions, or any inconsistency between any of the provisions of said code and the laws existing immediately preceding this enactment, the previously existing laws shall control.

[ 1950 ex.s. c 16 s 2.]